Utah statutes.
7-1-610.   Attorney-in-fact as to savings account -- Institution immune from liability.

Any depository institution may continue to recognize the authority of an attorney-in-fact authorized in writing to manage or to make withdrawals either in whole or in part from the savings account of a holder, whether minor or adult, until it is on actual notice of the revocation of his authority. No such institution shall be liable for damages, penalty, or tax by reason of any payment made under this section.



Enacted by Chapter 16, 1981 General Session

